Illinois, session 104th, HB2508.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 5adding Section 5-65 as follows: 6    (305 ILCS 5/5-65 new)7    Sec. 5-65. Reimbursement rates for long-term 8electrocardiogram monitoring. 9    (a) For the purpose of this Section, "long-term ambulatory 10electrocardiogram monitoring services" means the provision of 11external cardiac patch monitoring devices to patients to wear 12for 48 hours or greater and the interpretation of data 13gathered by such devices to detect heart arrhythmias that can 14lead to stroke, cardiac arrest, or other comorbidities or 15medical complications if not correctly diagnosed.16    (b) Subject to federal approval, for dates of service on 17and after January 1, 2026, the Department shall reimburse 18diagnostic testing facilities that provide long-term 19ambulatory electrocardiogram monitoring services at a rate not 20less than 80% of the Medicare Physician Fee Schedule rate for 21such services.